Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1984 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1984, 1989, 1994, and 2006 to make other minor word changes under AS

01.05.031

.

Administrative Code. —

For motor vehicle and driving offenses: rules of the road, see 13 AAC 02.

For motor vehicle and driving offenses: vehicle equipment and inspection, see 13 AAC 04.

For operations, wheeled vehicles, see 17 AAC 25.

For buses, see 17 AAC 28.